New York, session 2025-2026, S10377.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 7 of section 64 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law is amended by adding a new paragraph (e-18) to read as 3 follows: 4 (e-18) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdi- 5 vision, the authority may issue a retail license for on-premises 6 consumption for a premises which shall be within two hundred feet of a 7 building occupied exclusively as a school, church, synagogue or other 8 place of worship, provided such premises constitutes a premises for the 9 sale of food or beverages at retail for consumption on the premises 10 located wholly within the boundaries of the borough of Manhattan, county 11 of New York, city and state of New York, bounded and described as 12 follows: 13 PARCEL I: 14 Subject tract now known as Lot 22 Block 1660 on the Tax Map of the 15 City of New York, New York County State of New York and more particular- 16 ly described as follows: 17 BEGINNING at a point on the westerly side of 2nd Avenue distant 25 18 feet 5 inches (25.17 feet tax map) northerly of the corner formed by the 19 intersection of the northerly side of East 1 10th Street and the wester- 20 ly side of 2nd Avenue; 21 RUNNING THENCE westerly parallel with northerly side East 110th Street 22 and part of the distance through a party wall, 75 feet to a point; 23 THENCE northerly parallel with the westerly side of 2nd Avenue, 25 24 feet 3 inches (25.25 feet tax map) to a point; 25 THENCE easterly parallel with the northerly side of East 110th Street, 26 75 feet to the westerly side of 2nd Avenue to a point; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15831-01-6 S. 10377 2 1 THENCE southerly along the westerly side of 2nd Avenue, 25 feet 3 2 inches (25.25 feet tax map) to the point or place of BEGINNING. 3 SAID PREMISES BEING KNOWN AS AND BY; 2143 2nd Avenue New York, New 4 York 10029, Block 1660 Lot 22 New York County. 5 PARCEL II: 6 ALL that certain plot piece or parcel of land, with the buildings and 7 improvements thereon erected, situate, lying and being in the Borough of 8 Manhattan and City, County, and State of New York bounded and being 9 known as Lot 23 Block 1660 on the Tax Map of the City of New York, New 10 York County State of New York and more particularly described as 11 follows: 12 BEGINNING at a point on the westerly side of 2nd Avenue distant 50 13 feet 5 inches (50.42 feet tax map). northerly of the corner formed by 14 the intersection of the northerly side of East 110th Street and the 15 westerly side of 2nd Avenue; 16 RUNNING THENCE westerly parallel with northerly side East 1 10th 17 Street and part of the distance through a party wall, 75 feet to a 18 point; 19 THENCE northerly parallel with the westerly side of 2nd Avenue, 25 20 feet 3 inches (25.25 feet tax map) to a point; 21 THENCE easterly parallel with the northerly side of East 110th Street, 22 75 feet to the westerly side of 2nd Avenue to a point; 23 THENCE southerly along the westerly side of 2nd Avenue, 25 feet 3 24 inches (25.25 feet tax map) to the point or place of BEGINNING. 25 SAID PREMISES BEING KNOWN AS AND BY; 2145 2nd Avenue New York, New 26 York 10029, Block 1660 Lot 23 New York County. 27 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.